Louisiana, session 2026, HB14.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:783(A)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 11:783(A)(5)
is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§783. Selection of option for method of payment after death of member
A.
* * *
(2) Upon retirement or participation in the Deferred Retirement Option Plan
any member may make an election which is irrevocable after the effective date of
retirement or the effective date of participation in the Deferred Retirement Option
Plan to receive his benefit in a retirement allowance payable throughout life, or he
may make an election which is irrevocable after the effective date of retirement or
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-117 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 14
the effective date of participation in the Deferred Retirement Option Plan to receive
the actuarial equivalent of his retirement allowance in a reduced retirement
allowance payable throughout life with the provisions that:
Option 1. If he dies before he has received in annuity payments the present
value of his annuity as it was at the time of his retirement, the balance shall be paid
to his succession or to any person he shall designate in a written instrument
acknowledged and filed with the board of trustees.
Option 2. Upon his death, his reduced retirement allowance shall be
continued throughout the life of and paid to a natural person he shall irrevocably
designate in a written instrument acknowledged and filed with the board of trustees
at the time the election is made; or
Option 2A. Upon his death, his reduced retirement allowance shall be
continued throughout the life of and paid to a natural person he shall irrevocably
designate in a written instrument acknowledged and filed with the board of trustees
at the time the election is made, provided that if the designated beneficiary
predeceases the retiree, the retiree's reduced benefit shall change to the maximum
benefit effective on the first day of the next month following the death of the
designated beneficiary.
Option 3. Upon his death, one-half of his reduced retirement allowance shall
be continued throughout the life of and paid to a natural person he shall irrevocably
designate in a written instrument acknowledged and filed with the board of trustees
at the time the election is made; or
Option 3A. Upon his death, one-half of his reduced retirement allowance
shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to a natural person he shall
irrevocably designate in a written instrument acknowledged and filed with the board
of trustees at the time the election is made, provided that if the designated
beneficiary predeceases the retiree, the retiree's reduced benefit shall change to the
maximum benefit effective on the first day of the next month following the death of
the designated beneficiary.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-117 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 14
Option 4. Upon his death, some other benefit which shall not exceed the
Option 2 benefit amount, designated by him at the time the election is made, shall
be paid throughout the life of and to a natural person he shall irrevocably designate
in a written instrument acknowledged and filed with the board of trustees at the time
the election is made, provided such other benefit, together with the reduced
retirement allowance shall be certified by the actuary to be of equivalent actuarial
value to his retirement allowance, and approved by the board of trustees; or
Option 4A. Upon his death, some other benefit which shall not exceed the
Option 2 benefit amount, designated by him at the time the election is made shall be
paid throughout the life of and to a natural person he shall irrevocably designate in
a written instrument acknowledged and filed with the board of trustees at the time
the election is made, provided such other benefit, together with the reduced
retirement allowance, shall be certified by the actuary to be of equivalent actuarial
value to his retirement allowance, and approved by the board of trustees, provided
that if the designated beneficiary predeceases the retiree, the retiree's reduced benefit
shall change to the maximum benefit effective on the first day of the next month
following the death of the designated beneficiary.
Option 5. Upon his death, some other benefit or benefits shall be payable to
the member's child or children with a permanent mental or physical disability as he
shall nominate, provided such other benefit or benefits, together with the reduced
retirement allowance, shall be certified by the actuary to be of equivalent value to his
retirement allowance and approved by the board of trustees.
* * *
(5) If a member nominates his child or children diagnosed with a permanent
mental or physical disability to receive a benefit pursuant to Option 5 of this
Subsection, the medical determination of such disability shall be performed in
immediate proximity to, but before the effective date of, such member's retirement
or entry into the Deferred Retirement Option Plan. If a member requests the system
to perform a medical determination of disability for his child or children and the
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-117 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 14
member does not allocate to the child or children at least one-half of his reduced
benefit, at the discretion of the board of trustees, the member shall have the cost of
the medical determination deducted from his retirement benefits.
* * *
Section 2. The cost of this Act, if any, shall be funded with additional employer
contributions in compliance with Article X, Section 29(F) of the Constitution of Louisiana.